Hawaii statutes.
[§437B-21] Civil action. Nothing in
this chapter shall prohibit the bringing of a civil action against a motor
vehicle repair dealer, mechanic, or apprentice by an individual. [L 1975, c
143, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next